Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3362.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 201.014, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Requirements. new text begin (a) new text end Except as provided in subdivision 2, an individual who meets the following requirements at the time of an election is eligible to vote. The individual must: (1) be 18 years of age or older; (2) be a citizen of the United States; and (3) maintain residence in Minnesota for 20 days immediately preceding the election. new text begin (b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a), clause (1), an individual who has not reached 18 years of age but who meets all other eligibility requirements for voting may cast a ballot at a primary election or presidential nomination primary, for purposes of nominating candidates to be voted on at the subsequent general election, if the individual will be 18 years of age or older at the time the general election is held. The ballot provided to an individual authorized to vote under this paragraph must be prepared so that the individual may vote only for the candidates seeking nomination for office and not for any question or proposition. new text end